Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.420

Fluid dairy products to be packaged for retail sale in certain units.

All fluid dairy products, including but not limited to whole milk, skimmed milk, cultured milk, sweet cream, sour cream and buttermilk and all fluid imitation and fluid substitute dairy products shall be packaged for retail sale only in units as provided by the director of the department of agriculture by rule pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 17; 1975 1st ex.s. c 51 s 1; 1969 c 67 s 42.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.